Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-3316
Assessments; delinquent; interest; notice; lien; payment.

Special assessments levied pursuant to section 19-3315 shall become due in fifty days after the date of such levy and shall become delinquent in one or more installments over a period of not to exceed twenty years, in such manner as the mayor and city council shall determine at the time of making the levy. The first installment may become delinquent in fifty days after the date of levy if so specified by the mayor and the city council. Each of such installments shall draw interest before due date of not more than the rate of interest specified in section 45-104.01, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted by the Legislature, and after delinquency at the rate specified in section 45-104.01, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted by the Legislature, as the mayor and city council shall determine at the time the levy shall be made, except that any installment may be paid within fifty days of the date of such levy without interest being charged thereon. If three or more of such installments become delinquent and unpaid on the same property, the mayor and city council may by resolution declare all future installments on such delinquent property to be due on a future fixed date. The resolution shall set forth the description of the property and the name of its record title owner and shall provide that all future installments shall become delinquent upon such fixed date. A copy of such resolution shall be published one time each week for not less than twenty days in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in the city. After the fixed date, such future installments shall be deemed to be delinquent and the city may proceed to enforce and collect the total amount due and all future installments. Except as otherwise provided, all special assessments levied under section 19-3315 shall be liens on the property and shall be certified for collection and be collected in the same manner as special assessments made for improvements in street improvement districts in the city are collected.

Laws 1967, c. 60, § 16, p. 204;

R.S.Supp.,1967, § 16-827;

Laws 1969, c. 88, § 16, p. 444;

Laws 1973, LB 540, § 4;

Laws 1980, LB 933, § 25;

Laws 1981, LB 167, § 26;

Laws 1986, LB 960, § 17;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 195.